Washington statutes.
RCW 40.14.080

Chapter not to affect other laws.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed as repealing or modifying any other acts or parts of acts authorizing the destruction of public records save for those specifically named in *section 9 of this act; nor shall this chapter affect the provisions of chapter 40.07 RCW requiring the deposit of all state publications in the state library.

[ 1983 c 3 s 84; 1957 c 246 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "section 9 of this act" refers to 1957 c 246 s 9, which repealed RCW 40.08.010 through 40.08.050 and 40.12.010 through 40.12.110.